Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF906.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TRANSFER AND APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin (a) $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is transferred from the general fund to the housing development fund. This is a onetime transfer. new text end new text begin (b) $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the housing development fund to the commissioner of the Housing Finance Agency for the greater Minnesota housing infrastructure grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.395. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end